Washington statutes.
RCW 10.110.030

Individuals receiving medical care—Requirements for not being accompanied or secured.

(1) An individual receiving medical care under this section need not continue to be accompanied or otherwise secured if:

(a) The individual's medical care provider so indicates; or

(b) The officer determines, using his or her best judgment, that:

(i) The individual does not present an imminent and significant risk of causing physical harm to themselves or another person;

(ii) There is no longer sufficient evidentiary basis to maintain the individual in custody; or

(iii) In the interest of public safety, the presence of the officer is urgently required at another location and the officer determines, using his or her best judgment and in consultation with his or her supervisor, if available on duty, that the public safety interest outweighs the need to accompany or secure the individual in the hospital.

(2)(a) In the event that a medical care provider determines the individual need not be accompanied or otherwise secured pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the officer has no ongoing duty to accompany or otherwise secure the individual for the duration of their treatment by the hospital. When a medical care provider indicates that a person need not be accompanied or otherwise secured, the hospital must notify the officer or the officer's designee when the individual is expected to be released by the hospital.

(b) If, after a medical provider indicates that the individual need not be accompanied or otherwise secured pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the individual demonstrates behavior that presents an imminent and significant risk of causing physical harm to themselves or others and the physical condition of the individual renders the individual capable of causing physical harm to themselves or others, the hospital may request the presence of an officer to guard or otherwise accompany the individual, in which case subsection (1)(a) and (b) of this section still apply.

(3) In the event the officer determines the individual need not be accompanied or otherwise secured pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section, the officer must notify the medical care provider that the officer is leaving the individual unattended or unsecured, in which case the hospital has no duty to notify the officer when the individual is, or expected to be, released from the hospital.

(4) In the event that the officer is urgently required at another location pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(iii) of this section, the officer must notify the medical care provider or, if an immediate departure is required, other hospital staff member that the officer is leaving the individual unattended or unsecured and make a reasonable effort to ensure a replacement officer or other means of accompanying or securing the individual as soon as reasonably possible under the circumstances. The hospital must notify the officer or the officer's designee if the individual is, or is expected to be, released from the hospital prior to the officer or a replacement officer returning to resume accompanying or otherwise securing the individual.

(5) Except for actions or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful misconduct, the hospital and health care providers as defined in chapter 18.130 RCW are immune from liability, including civil liability, professional conduct sanctions, and administrative actions resulting from the individual not being accompanied or secured.

[ 2015 c 267 s 2.]